California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 40019, an electric utility may collect the surcharge from another electric utility under such terms and conditions as are agreed upon by the electric utilities involved and the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

40020.

The surcharge required to be collected by the elecric utility from the consumer shall be added to the charges to the consumer for the electrical energy sold. The amount of the surcharge may be stated separately. If the electric utility does not separately state the amount of the surcharge, the electric utility shall print on the billing a notice to the effect that the charges include energy resources surcharge computed at (applicable rate) mill per kilowatt hour. Until January 1, 1976, such notice need not appear on the billing itself provided that the electric utility notifies each of its customers, no later than at the time it renders a bill for the first regular
 billing period applicable to that person which starts on or after the operative date of this part, that electical energy charges shall include energy resources surcharge computed at (applicable rate) mill per kilowatt-hour. If the Board of Equalization fixes a new rate in l975, the electric utility shall notify its customers of the new rate at or prior to the time a billing is rendered to the customer subject to the new rate if the electric utility does not separately state the amount of the surcharge or print on the billing notice that the surcharge is included in the charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40021.

The surcharge required to be collected by the electric utility, and any amount unreturned to the consumer which is not a surcharge but was collected from the consumer as representing a surcharge, constitutes debts owed by the electric utility to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40022.

Any amounts collected by an electric utility from a consumer on account of the purchase of electrical energy the consumption of which is subject to the surcharge shall be applied proportionately between the liability of the consumer on account of the purchase of the electrical energy and the liability of the consumer for the surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40023.

An electric utility is relieved from liability to collect the surcharge insofar as the base upon which the surcharge is imposed is represented by accounts which have been found to be worthless and charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. If the electric utility has previously paid the amount of the surcharge it may, under regulations prescribed by the board, take as a deduction on its return the amount found to be worthless and charged off. If any such accounts are thereafter collected in whole or in part the surcharge so collected shall be paid with the first return filed after such collection.

The board may by regulation promulgate such other rules with respect to uncollected or worthless accounts as it shall deem necessary to the fair and efficient administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40024.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, persons subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission need not obtain any authorization from the commission to comply with the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 940.)
-------------------------------------------

40025.

The rate fixed by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40016 shall apply with respect to billing periods beginning on or after July 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1067, Sec. 7.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration [40035. - 40036.]

40035.

Every electric utility selling electrical energy for consumption in this state shall register with the board upon a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the utility transacts or intends to transact business and such other information as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40036.

(a) When necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the board may require any person subject to this part to place with it the security that the board determines. Security in the form of cash, insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, or a bond or bonds duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all of the requirements of this part and expressly providing for the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations of the person arising out of this
 part, shall be held in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section. The amount of security shall be fixed by the board, not to exceed twice the estimated average quarterly liability of persons filing for quarterly periods, determined in the manner that the board deems proper. Security held by the board shall be released after a three-year period in which the person has filed all returns and paid all tax due to the state under this part or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state within the time required.

(b) If, when a person discontinues business, the board holds security pursuant to this section in the form of cash or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, the security when applied to the account of the taxpayer shall be deemed a payment on any liability of the person to the board on the date the business is discontinued.

(c) This section shall not apply to a taxpayer who either has timely filed all returns and paid all tax due to the state under this part for the three consecutive years prior to the effective date of this section, or has, on or before July 31, 1998, timely filed all returns and paid all tax due to the state under this part since the taxpayer registered with the board pursuant to Section 40035. However, the board may require security from any such taxpayer who fails to remain in compliance with the reporting and payment requirements of this part subsequent to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Special Provisions and Exemptions [40041. - 40046.]

40041.

The consumption of electrical energy which this state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of the United States or under the Constitution of this state is exempt from the surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40041.5.

In any instances where an exemption is claimed by reason of the provisions of Section 40041, an electric utility or a consumer may request the board to issue a ruling as to the validity of the exemption, accompanying the request with a statement showing the facts and basis for the claim. The board shall issue its ruling within 30 days of receipt of the request. Pending issuance of the ruling, the electric utility shall not be obligated to collect the surcharge from the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40043.

The consumption by an electric utility of purchased electrical energy that is used directly, lost by dissipation or unaccounted for in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles by the electric utility in the process of generation, transmission and distribution of electrical energy is exempt from the surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40044.

When an electric utility purchases electrical energy and pools in its system the energy with electrical energy generated by it, the consumption of electrical energy in this state from the pool by the utility during any quarter shall be deemed to be a consumption of energy generated by it to the extent that the kilowatt-hours of the electrical energy generated by it during the quarter exceeds the kilowatt-hours consumed by the electric utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40045.

For the purpose of the proper administration of this part it shall be presumed that electrical energy sold by an electric utility in this state to other than an electric utility is consumed by the purchaser in this state until the contrary is established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40046.

The amount of kilowatt-hours of electrical energy determined by or stated on a billing of an electric utility in accordance with its business practices and accounting records to have been sold to a consumer during any calendar quarter or billing period of the electric utility shall be presumed to be correct. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence which establishes that the amount of kilowatt-hours was other than such amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Determination of Surcharge [40051. - 40105.]



  ARTICLE 1. Due and Payable Dates [40051. - 40053.]

40051.

The surcharges imposed by this part and the amounts thereof required to be collected by electric utilities are due quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40052.

Amounts due under Section 40051 for which a billing for the electrical energy is issued by an electric utility to the consumer prior to the close of a calendar quarter are payable when due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40053.

Any amounts of the surcharge required to be paid or collected that are not billed in the ordinary course of the billings by an electric utility may be determined by the board against the utility or the consumer, or both, in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or 4 (commencing with Section 40081) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Returns and Payments [40061. - 40065.5.]

40061.

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the board in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media.

A return shall be filed by every electric utility and by every person purchasing electrical energy, the consumption of which is subject to the surcharge and who has not paid the surcharge billed and required to be collected by an electric utility. The return shall be signed
 by the person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40062.

The return filed by an electric utility shall show the number of kilowatt-hours of electrical energy sold to consumers in this state for which billing was first made during that quarter that are due and required to be collected for all such billings. The return shall further show the number of kilowatt-hours of electrical energy purchased by the electric utility during the calendar quarter and the number of kilowatt-hours of electrical energy generated by such electric utility during such period. Such return shall also set forth the number of kilowatt-hours consumed during such period by the electric utility for its own use and consumption and such other information as
 the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40063.

The board may prescribe the contents of returns of consumers subject to the surcharge. It may require the filing of returns by consumers in addition to those required by Section 40061 in circumstances where it finds that consumers’ liabilities are not being included in the return of an electric utility or it determines that consumer returns are necessary for the efficient administration of this part. Consumers’ returns shall cover the periods as the board may prescribe and shall be in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited
 to, electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40064.

The person required to file the return shall deliver the return together with a remittance of the amount of the surcharge payable to the office of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40065.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend not to exceed one month the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any surcharge required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted. 

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

 (c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the surcharge, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the surcharge would have been due without the extension of the date
 of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 7.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

40065.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 50.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [40067. - 40069.5.]

40067.

(a) Any person whose estimated surcharge liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated surcharge liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may
 elect to remit amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 40051) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 40061). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting surcharges by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting
 period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the surcharge with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit surcharges pursuant to this article who remits those surcharges by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the surcharges incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any surcharge to the state or any amount of surcharge required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 40081), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the surcharge or amount of surcharge, in addition to the surcharge or amount of
 surcharge, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the surcharge or the amount of surcharge required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated surcharge liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the surcharge due for any one return. Any person remitting surcharges by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 40101.

(i) The board shall
 promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 15.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

40068.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 40067. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40069.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an
 automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of surcharge. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 40067 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be
 paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40069.5.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document
 otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 40069 (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 500.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deficiency Determinations [40071. - 40079.]

40071.

If the board is not satisfied with return or returns of the surcharge or the amount of surcharge required to be paid to the state by any person, it may compute and determine the amount required to be paid upon the basis of the facts contained in the return or returns or upon the basis of any information within its possession or that may come into its possession. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount payable for one or for more than one period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40072.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the day of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 45.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

40073.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40074.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40075.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determintion shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40076.

The department shall give to the electric utility or person consuming electrical energy written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope with postage paid addressed to the electric utility or person consuming electrical energy at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of such delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The feepayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the feepayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic
 mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the feepayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 65.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

40077.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires the later. In the case of failure to make a return, every notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 66.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

40078.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the surcharge or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 67.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

40079.

If, before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 40077 for serving a notice of deficiency determination, the taxpayer has consented in writing to the service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 68.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Determinations If No Return Made [40081. - 40085.]

40081.

If any person fails to make a return, the board shall make an estimate of the amount of kilowatt-hours sold for consumption by the person, or, as the case may be, of the amount of kilowatt-hours purchased by the person, the consumption of which in this state is subject to the surcharge. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the board’s possession or may come into its possession. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a
 penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

40082.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40083.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 46.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

40084.

If the failure of any person to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 percent penalty provided in Section 40081.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40085.

Promptly after making its determination the department shall give to the person written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 69.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [40091. - 40097.]

40091.

Any person against whom a determination is made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or 4 (commencing with Section 40081) of this chapter may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the person of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40092.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40093.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in his petition, shall grant the person an oral hearing and shall give him 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40094.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 40075 or Section 40084 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the increase is asserted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40095.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40096.

All determinations made by the board under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 40081) are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40097.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 70.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [40101. - 40105.]

40101.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any surcharge to the state or any amount of surcharge required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 40081), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the surcharge or amount of the surcharge, in addition to the surcharge or amount of surcharge, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to
 Section 6591.5, from the date on which the surcharge or the amount of surcharge required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 40061 shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the surcharge with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the surcharge for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40101.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the surcharge was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the surcharge was made one business day after the date the surcharge was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of the surcharge.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, or a determination where no return has been filed.

(e) This section shall
 only apply to electronic payments of surcharges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 40.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

40102.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 40067, 40081, 40096, and 40101.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which that person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may
 grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 51.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40103.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 40065, 40067, 40083, and 40101.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 52.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40103.5.
